Utah, session 2026, HB206.
Section 1. Section 76-9-1102 is amended to read:76-9-1102. Cigarette or tobacco advertising violation.(1)Terms defined in Sections 76-1-101.5 and 76-9-1101 apply to this section.(2)Except as provided in Subsection (4), an actor commits cigarette or tobacco advertising violation if the actor displays on a billboard, streetcar sign, streetcar, bus, placard, or on any other object or place of display, an advertisement of cigarettes, electronic cigarette products, cigarette papers, cigars, chewing tobacco, nicotine products, or smoking tobacco or any disguise or substitute of cigarettes, cigarette papers, tobacco, or cigars.(3)A violation of Subsection (2) is a class B misdemeanor.(4)(a)A dealer of cigarettes, electronic cigarette products, cigarette papers, tobacco, cigars, nicotine products, or a substitute for cigarettes, cigarette papers, tobacco, or cigars may have a sign on the front of the dealer's place of business stating that the dealer is a dealer of cigarettes, electronic cigarette products, cigarette papers, tobacco, cigars, nicotine products, or a substitute for cigarettes, cigarette papers, tobacco, or cigars.(b)This section does not prohibit the advertisement of an item listed in Subsection (4)(a) in a newspaper, magazine or periodical printed or circulating in this state.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.